Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1311
Arbitration board; personnel; hire.

The arbitration board shall hire an official stenographer to report its hearings and may hire an attorney to assist it in ruling on the admissibility of evidence offered and in the preparation of the record which will constitute the bill of exceptions in any appeal from the decision of the arbitration board and may hire such other personnel as it deems necessary to conduct the hearing.

Laws 1979, LB 207, § 11.